tests/data/oci-pgen.dix
<pardef n="ne_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>ne'u<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/><a/>los<b/></l>
			<r>ne'us<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>




	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/><a/>ac<b/></l>
			<r>n'ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/><a/>lo<b/><a/>ac<b/></l>
			<r>ne<b/>l'ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/><a/>la<b/><a/>ac<b/></l>
			<r>ne<b/>l'ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me_te_se_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>e'u<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>los<b/></l>
			<r>e'us<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>e<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>la<b/></l>
			<r>e<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>ac<b/></l>
			<r>'ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>i<b/></l>
			<r>'i<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>e<b/><a/>en<b/></l>
			<r>e'n<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

 <pardef n="tant">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tant<b/></l>
			<r>tant<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tant</l>
			<r>tan</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>tant<b/></l>
			<r>tan<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>autant<b/></l>
			<r>autant<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>autant</l>
			<r>autan</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>autant<b/></l>
			<r>autan<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>




	 <pardef n="pronom_aton_apostrofat">
		 <e>
			 <i><b/>mos</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>me<b/></l>
				 <r>'m<b/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>me<b/></l>
				 <r><b/>m'</r>
			 </p>
				<par n="vocal_general"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>te<b/></l>
				 <r>'t<b/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>te<b/></l>
				 <r><b/>t'</r>
			 </p>
				<par n="vocal_general"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				<l><b/><a/>vos</l>
				<r><b/>vos</r>
			</p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				<l><b/><a/>vse</l>
				<r><b/>vse</r>
			</p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>lo</l>
				 <r><b/>lo</r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>la</l>
				 <r><b/>la</r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
				 <r><b/>l'</r>
			 </p>
				<par n="vocal_general"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>la<b/></l>
				 <r><b/>l'</r>
			 </p>
				<par n="vocal_general"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>se<b/></l>
				 <r>'s<b/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		<e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>les<b/></l>
				 <r><b/>les<b/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
				 <r>'n<b/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l><b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
				 <r><b/>n'</r>
			 </p>
				<par n="vocal_general"/>
		 </e>
	 </pardef>

	 <pardef n="no_contrac">
		 <e>
			 <par n="consonant"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <par n="pronom_aton_apostrofat"/>
		 </e>
		
		 <e>
			 <par n="caracter_general"/>
		 </e>
		
</pardef>
<pardef n="eth">
	<e>
		<i>th</i>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<i>th<b/></i>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/></l>
			<r>th<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/></l>
			<r>r<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/></l>
			<r>r<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/>de<b/><a/>eth</l>
			<r>th<b/>deth</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/>de<b/><a/>era</l>
			<r>th<b/>dera</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/>de<b/><a/>es</l>
			<r>th<b/>des</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/>de<b/><a/>eth<b/></l>
			<r>th<b/>der<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>th<b/><a/>de<b/><a/>eth<b/><a/></l>
			<r>th<b/>der<b/><a/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	
</pardef>

<pardef n="contrac_det">
	<e>
		<par n="eth"/>
	</e> 
	<e>
		<i>ra<b/></i>
	</e>
	<e>
		<i>s</i>
	</e>
 </pardef>
 
 
 
 <pardef n="contraccio_per_oci">
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l/>
			 <r>r<b/><a/></r>
		 </p>
	 </e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>r<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>l<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>ls<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
 </pardef>

 <pardef n="contraccio_per_gascon">
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l/>
			 <r>r<b/><a/></r>
		 </p>
	 </e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>r<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>u<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>us<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
 </pardef>

 <pardef n="contraccio_per_aran">	
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l/>
			 <r>r<b/><a/></r>
		 </p>
	 </e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>r<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>u<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>us<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
 </pardef>

 <pardef n="contraccio">
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>e</l>
			 <r/>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contrac_det"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l/>
			 <r><b/><a/></r>
		 </p>
	 </e>
 </pardef>

 
 <pardef n="apostrofadors">
	 <e>
		 <par n="vocal_general"/>
	 </e>
	 
	 
	 
	<e>
		 <p>
			 <l><a/>e</l>
			 <r>e</r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="eth"/>
	 </e>
 </pardef>
 

 <pardef n="apostrofadors_de">
	 <e>
		 <par n="vocal_general"/>
	 </e>

	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l><a/>enquia<b/><a/></l>
			 <r>enquia</r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="contraccio"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l><a/>enquia</l>
			 <r>enquia</r>
		 </p>
	 </e>
	 
 </pardef>


<pardef n="li_ac">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>lo<b/></l>
			<r>ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>la<b/></l>
			<r>ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>les<b/></l>
			<r>ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="les_ac">
	<e>
		<par n="li_ac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l>ne</l>
			<r>ac</r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="me_te">
	
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l/>
			<r>e</r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>e<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="contraccio_en">
	
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>eth<b/></l>
			<r><b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>era</l>
			<r>a</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>es</l>
			<r>es</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/></l>
			<r><b/><a/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="apostrof_e">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/></l>
			<r>'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors"/>
	</e> 
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>e<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>en<b/></l>
			<r>'en</r>
		</p>
		<par n="contraccio_en"/>
	</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="apostrof_en">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>i<b/></l>
			<r>n'i<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e> 
		<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/></l>
			<r>n'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors"/>
	</e> 
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>n'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l/>
			<r>ne</r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>ne<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="no_contrac"/>
	</e>
</pardef>




 

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>jos<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>jos<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sus<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>sus<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>per<b/><a/></l>
			<r>pe</r>
		</p>
		<par n="contraccio_per_oci"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>que<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne</l>
			<r/>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_en"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que</l>
			<r>qu</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
 	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>a<b/><a/></l>
			<r>a</r>
		</p>
		<par n="contraccio"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>en<b/></l>
			<r>en</r>
		</p>
		<par n="contraccio_en"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="tant"/>
	</e>
